test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaarre_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - várre: # N_EVEN
    várre+N+Sg+Nom: várre
    várre+N+Sg+Gen: váre
    várre+N+Sg+Acc: várev
    várre+N+Sg+Ill: várráj
    várre+N+Sg+Ine: váren
    várre+N+Sg+Ela: [várest, váres]
    várre+N+Sg+Com: [värijn, värijna]
    várre+N+Pl+Nom: váre
    várre+N+Pl+Gen: värij
    várre+N+Pl+Acc: värijt
    várre+N+Pl+Ill: värijda
    várre+N+Pl+Ine: värijn
    várre+N+Pl+Ela: [värijst, värijs]
    várre+N+Pl+Com: [värij, värijgum]
    várre+N+Ess: várren
#    várre+N+Abe: váredak #?uncertain

 
 
